Delaware, session 153, HB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 1305, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1305. Basic salary schedule for teachers, specialists, nurses, principals, superintendents, and other administrative and supervisory employees [For application of this section, see 85 Del. Laws, c. 62, Â§8(m)(6)]. ( l ) (1) In addition to the base salary derived from subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the following employees shall receive a salary supplement equal to 12% of the employeeâs base salary: a. an employee A teacher who has achieved certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or from an equivalent program approved by the State Board shall receive a salary supplement equal to 12% of the base salary so derived. Standards, who is employed as a teacher. b. A nationally certified school nurse from the National Board for Certification of School Nurses (NBCSN), who is employed as a school nurse. c. A nationally certified school counselor from the National Board for Certified Counselors (NBCC) or the National Board of Professional Teaching Standards, who is employed as a school counselor. d. A nationally certified school social worker holding a Certified School Social Work Specialist (C-SSWS) credential from the National Association of Social Workers, who is employed as a school social work specialist. e. Any other position identified by Department regulations. (2) In addition to the base salary derived from subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the following employees shall receive a salary supplement equal to 6% of the employeeâs base salary: a. A speech pathologist or audiologist with a Certificate of Clinical Competency, who is employed as a speech pathologist or audiologist. b. A music therapist, who is board-certified from the Certification Board for Music Therapists and is employed as a music therapist. c. A school-based licensed occupational therapist, who is employed as an occupational therapist. d. A school-based physical therapist who has passed the National Physical Therapy Exam, who is employed as a physical therapist. e. A licensed school psychologist, who is employed as a school psychologist. f. Any other position identified by Department regulations. An employee shall receive a salary supplement equal to 6% of base salary so derived for receiving any of the following national certifications: (1) Certificate of clinical competence from the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association (ASHA)âspeech pathologists and audiologists. (2) Nationally-certified school counselor from the National Board for Certified Counselors (NBCC). (3) Music therapistâBoard-certified from the Certification Board for Music Therapists (CBMT). (4) Nationally-certified school psychologist from the National Association of School Psychologists (NASP). (5) Nationally-certified school nurse from the National Board for Certification of School Nurses (NBCSN). (6) Occupational therapist advanced certification from the American Occupational Therapy Association or the Occupational Therapist Registered from the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy. (7) School-based physical therapists who have passed the National Physical Therapy Exam (NPTE) as administered by the Federation of State Boards of Physical Therapy (FSBPT). (3) The Professional Standards Board, with the approval of the State Board of Education, may authorize stipends pursuant to this subsection in fiscal year 2000. The supplement shall be in the form of an additional salary amount spread evenly across an employeeâs contract period similar to base salary. Funding for National Board certification described in this subsection is subject to an annual appropriation. The Department of Education shall provide for funding the supplement provisions of this subsection in its annual budget. (4) For those employees who have achieved certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards (NBPTS) and who serve as teacher or lead mentors, the mentor stipend payment for such service will be excluded from the 15% salary supplement limit established in subsection (o) of this section.